Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.170

Transfer of membership.

Any former employee of a department of a city of the first class who (1) was a member of the employees' retirement system of such city, and (2) is now employed within the police department of such city, may transfer his or her membership from the city employees' retirement system to the city's police relief and pension fund system by filing a written request with the board of administration and the board of trustees, respectively, of the two systems.

Upon the receipt of such request, the transfer of membership to the city's police relief and pension fund system shall be made, together with a transfer of all accumulated contributions credited to such member. The board of administration of the city's employees' retirement system shall transmit to the board of trustees of the city's police relief and pension fund system a record of service credited to such member which shall be computed and credited to such member as a part of his or her period of employment in the city's police relief and pension fund system. For the purpose of the transfer contemplated by this section, the affected individuals shall be allowed to restore withdrawn contributions to the city employees' retirement system and reinstate their membership service records.

Any employee so transferring shall have all the rights, benefits and privileges that he or she would have been entitled to had he or she been a member of the city's police relief and pension fund system from the beginning of his or her employment with the city.

No person so transferring shall thereafter be entitled to any other public pension, except that provided by chapter 41.26 RCW or social security, which is based upon service with the city.

The right of any employee to file a written request for transfer of membership as set forth herein shall expire December 31, 1973.

[ 2012 c 117 s 35; 1973 c 143 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 27; 1963 c 82 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—Construction—1969 ex.s. c 209: See RCW 41.26.3901, 41.26.3902, and 41.26.3903.